Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-935
Existing cemetery association; transfer; deeds; how executed.

Subsequent to the relinquishment by the mayor and city council of a city of the second class or the chairperson and village board of trustees of a village to the proper officers of a cemetery association, as provided in section 17-934, the deeds to all burial lots executed by the trustees of such cemetery association, through its president and secretary, shall as a matter of course be signed, sealed, acknowledged, and delivered by the proper officers of such city or village as other real property of such city or village is conveyed, except that the transfer of such burial lots shall not require a vote of a majority of the electors of such city or village to make title to the same valid and legal in the purchaser or purchasers thereof.

Laws 1929, c. 46, § 8, p. 198;

C.S.1929, § 17-548;

R.S.1943, § 17-935;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 268.